Virginia statutes. Title 63.2. Welfare (Social Services).
Chapter 1. General Provisions.
The 2003 amendment by c. 467 substituted “12” for “twelve,” “13” for “thirteen,” “16” for “sixteen,” “18” for “eighteen,” “21” for “twenty-one,” “22” for “twenty-two,” “24” for “twenty-four,” and “62” for “sixty-two” throughout the section; deleted “including but not limited to, U.S. Department of Housing and Urban Development Sections 8, 202, 221(d) (3), 221(d) (4), 231, 236, or 811 housing” following “Development” in clause (iv) of the definition of “Assisted living facility”; and substituted “Office of Personnel Management” for “Department of Health and Human Services” in the definition of “Merit system plan.”

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 70 substituted “18” for “eighteen” in the introductory paragraph of the definition of “Abused or neglected child”; substituted “24” for “twenty-four” in the definition of “Child day program”; substituted “12” for “twelve” in the third sentence of the definition of “Family day home”; and inserted the definition of “Kinship care.”

The 2004 amendment by c. 196, in the paragraph defining “Children’s residential facility,” substituted “or for the purpose of providing independent living services to persons between 18 and 21 years of age who are in the process of transitioning out of foster care. Children’s residential facility shall not include” for “except” at the end.

The 2004 amendment by c. 245 added the last paragraph in the definition of “Abused or neglected child”; and substituted “12” for “twelve” in the first and third sentences of the definition of “Family day home.”

The 2004 amendment by c. 753, added the language beginning “including, but not limited” in subdivision 1 of the definition of “Abused or neglected child”; twice substituted “12” for “twelve” in the definition of “Family day home.”

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 868, in the paragraph defining “Abused or neglected child,” inserted the subdivision 6 designation and the first paragraph thereof, transferred the second paragraph in subdivision 5 to the second paragraph in subdivision 6 and made a related change.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendments by cc. 479 and 597 are nearly identical, and added the last sentence in subdivision 2 in the definition of “Abused or neglected child.”

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 475 and 483 are nearly identical, and in the definition of “Independent living,” substituted “planned program of services designed to assist a child aged 16 and over” for “program of services and activities for children in foster care who are 16 years of age or older” near the beginning and substituted “in transitioning” for “that prepares them for the successful transition” at the end; inserted the definitions of “Independent living arrangement” and “Independent living services,” and deleted the definition of “Independent living placement.”

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 705 added the last sentence of the paragraph defining “Adult neglect.”

The 2009 amendments by cc. 813 and 840 are identical, and substituted “Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services” for “Department of Mental Health, Mental Retardation and Substance Abuse Services” in clause (i) of the paragraphs defining “Adult day care center” and “Assisted living facility.”

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by cc. 5 and 156 are identical, and deleted “or the public agency designated by the community policy and management team” following “local board” in the definition for “Foster care placement.”

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 803 and 835, cl. 59, effective July 1, 2013, are identical, and in the definition for “Independent living,” substituted “age 16” for “aged 16”; and in the definition for “Social services,” deleted “adult services, adult protective services” following “adoption assistance” and added the last sentence.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 5, in the paragraph defining “Independent living,” deleted “from foster care” preceding “to self-sufficiency.”

The 2013 amendments by cc. 362 and 564 are identical, and added the clause (i) designator and added clause (ii) in the paragraph defining “Independent living services.”

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 502 and 503 are identical, and in subdivision 6 of the definition for “Abused or neglected child,” substituted “emergency medical services agency” for “rescue squad” twice and “medical services providers” for “medical technicians” in the second paragraph.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 758 and 770 are identical, effective July 1, 2016, and in the definition for “Family day home” substituted “five” for “six” in the third sentence and “related to the provider by blood or marriage” for “grandchildren of the provider” in the fifth sentence.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 631 added subdivision 7 in the definition for “Abused or neglected child”; added the definition for “Sibling.”

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 195, inserted “as defined in §

63.2-1603

” in the definitions for “Adult abuse,” “Adult neglect,” and “Adult protective services”; rewrote the definition for “Adult exploitation,” which formerly read: “ ‘Adult exploitation’ means the illegal use of an incapacitated adult or his resources for another’s profit or advantage.”

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 497, in the definition for “Independent living,” inserted “or were formerly committed to the Department of Juvenile Justice and are”; in the definition for “Independent living arrangement,” inserted “or (ii) a child at least 16 years of age or a person between the ages of 18 and 21 who was committed to the Department of Juvenile Justice immediately prior to placement by the Department of Juvenile Justice”; and in the definition for “Independent living services,” inserted clause (iii) in the second sentence; and made stylistic changes.

The 2018 amendments by cc. 769 and 770 are identical, and added the definitions for “Kinship guardian,” “Kinship guardianship,” and “Kinship Guardianship Assistance program.”

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 210 substituted “Virginia Initiative for Education and Work (VIEW)” for “the Virginia Initiative for Employment Not Welfare (VIEW)” in the definition for “Temporary Assistance for Needy Families-Unemployed Parent.”

The 2019 amendments by cc. 282 and 688 are identical, and added the definitions for “Family and permanency team,” “Fictive kin,” “Qualified individual,” and “Qualified residential treatment program”; and in the definition for “Foster home,” substituted “a residence licensed by a child-placing agency or local board” for “the place of residence of any natural person.”

The 2019 amendment by c. 297, in the definition of “Child-placing agency,” inserted “(i)” and “(ii)” and added clause (iii) in the first sentence and added the second sentence; in the definition for “Foster care placement,” added the second sentence; in the definition for “Foster home,” inserted “or a child who is the subject of a power of attorney to delegate parental or legal custodial powers by his parents or legal custodian to the natural person who has been designated the child’s legal guardian pursuant to Chapter 10 (§

20-166

et seq.) of Title 20 and who exercises legal authority over the child on a continuous basis for at least 24 hours without compensation”; in the definition for “Independent foster home,” added clause (iii); and made stylistic changes.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 95 and 732 are identical, and in the definition for “Adult foster care,” added the third sentence; in the definition for “Child,” added clause (ii); and inserted the definition for “Supervised independent living setting.”

The 2020 amendment by cc. 224 and 366 are identical, and in the definition for “Foster home,” substituted “approved” for “licensed.”

The 2020 amendment by c. 829 substituted “Tier III” for “violent sexual” in subdivision 6 of the definition for “Abused or neglected child.”

The 2020 amendments by cc. 860 and 861, effective July 1, 2021, are identical, and deleted the definitions for “Child day center,” “Child day program,” “Family day home,” “Family day system,” and “Registered family day home” (now see § 22.1-289.02, effective July 1, 2021); and in the definition for “Child-welfare agency,” deleted “child day center” following “means a” and deleted “family day home, family day system” following “facility.”

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 254, effective July 1, 2021, added the definitions of “Federal-Funded Kinship Guardianship Assistance program” and “State-Funded Kinship Guardianship Assistance program”; in the definition of “Kinship guardianship,” inserted “or

63.2-1306

” and deleted the definition of “Kinship Guardianship Assistance program.”

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendments by cc. 80 and 81 are identical, and in the definition of “Abused or neglected child” in subdivision 7 in the second paragraph, inserted “within 30 days of the child’s birth,” “(i),” and “(ii),” deleted “or to” following “24-hour emergency services,” and substituted “or (iii) a newborn safety device located at and operated by such hospital or emergency medical services agency” for “within 14 days of the child’s birth”; and made a stylistic changes.

The 2022 amendments by c. 366 inserted “or an intimate partner of such parent or person” in the definition of “Abused or neglected child” in subdivision 4; and made stylistic changes.

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia law on governmental services and social welfare for the year 1978-1979, see 66 Va. L. Rev. 301 (1980).

For survey of developments in Virginia domestic relations law for year 1979-80, see 67 Va. L. Rev. 351 (1981).

For survey on legal issues involving children in Virginia for 1989, see 23 U. Rich. L. Rev. 705 (1989).

For 2000 survey of Virginia health law, see 34 U. Rich. L. Rev. 853 (2000).

For 2003/2004 survey of family and juvenile law, see 39 U. Rich. L. Rev. 241 (2004).

For 2006 survey article, “Family and Juvenile Law,” see 41 U. Rich. L. Rev. 151 (2006).

For 2007 annual survey article, “Family and Juvenile Law,” see 42 U. Rich. L. Rev. 417 (2007).

For 2007 annual survey article, “Health Care Law,” see 42 U. Rich. L. Rev. 441 (2007).

For Comment, “Unreasonable Seizure: Government Removal of Children from Homes with Drugs but No Evidence of Neglect,” see 20 Geo. Mason L. Rev. 631 (2013).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

9B M.J. Hospitals and Sanitariums, § 2; 9B M.J. Infants and Juveniles, § 81; 14B M.J. Poor and Poor Laws, § 2.